Utah statutes.
38-3-3.   Attachment in aid of lien.
Whenever any rent shall be due and unpaid under a lease, or the lessee shall
be about to remove his property from the leased premises, the lessor may have
the personal property of the lessee which is upon the leased premises and
subject to such lien attached without other ground for such attachment.
